Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 7. General Powers and Duties of School Boards.

§ 22.1-71.
School board constitutes body corporate; corporate powers.

The duly appointed or elected members shall constitute the school board. Every such school board is declared a body corporate and, in its corporate capacity, is vested with all the powers and charged with all the duties, obligations and responsibilities imposed upon school boards by law and may sue, be sued, contract, be contracted with and, in accordance with the provisions of this title, purchase, take, hold, lease and convey school property, both real and personal. School board members appointed or elected by district or otherwise shall have no organization or duties except such as may be assigned to them by the school board as a whole.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-63, 22-94; 1980, c. 559; 1998, c. 102.

Law Review.

For comment, “ ‘Working to the Contract’ in Virginia: Legal Consequences of Teachers’ Attempts to Limit Their Contractual Duties,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 449 (1982).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 11.1.

§ 22.1-72.
Annual organizational meetings of school boards.

Each school board shall hold its annual organizational meeting for the purpose of establishing its regular meeting schedule for the ensuing year as follows: (i) in January or July, if the school board serves a city or town constituting a school division, regardless of whether its members are appointed or elected or any combination thereof; (ii) in July, if the school board serves a county constituting a school division and its members are solely appointed; or (iii) in January or July, if the school board serves a county constituting a school division and its members are elected in whole or in part.

A school board may also hold special meetings when necessary. Each school board shall fix its own procedure for calling and holding any special meeting.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-45, 22-46, 22-97; 1954, c. 291; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1968, c. 501; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1978, c. 430; 1980, c. 559; 1995, c. 74; 2002, cc. 222, 231.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 222 and 231 are identical, and inserted “January or” in clause (i) in the first paragraph.

§ 22.1-73.
Quorum.

At any meeting of a school board a majority of such board shall constitute a quorum.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-51; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-74.
Minutes of meetings.

The minutes of all school board meetings shall be signed by the chairman and clerk.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-52; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-75.
Procedure in case of tie vote.

In any case in which there is a tie vote of the school board of any school division when all the members are not present, the question shall be passed by until the next meeting when it shall again be voted upon even though all members are not present. In any case in which there is a tie vote on any question after complying with this procedure or in any case in which there is a tie vote when all the members of the school board are present, the proceedings thereon shall be in conformity with the proceedings prescribed below, except that the tie breaker, if any, appointed pursuant to §

15.2-410

,

15.2-531

,

15.2-837

, 22.1-40, 22.1-44, or 22.1-47, or elected pursuant to §

15.2-627

or 22.1-57.3, whichever is applicable, shall cast the deciding vote.

In any case in which there is a tie vote of the school board, the clerk shall record the vote; immediately notify the tie breaker to vote; and request his presence, if practicable, at the present meeting of the board. However, if that is not practicable, the board may adjourn to a day fixed in the minutes of the board or, in case of a failure to agree on a day, to a day the clerk fixes and enters in the minutes. At the present meeting or on the day named in the minutes, the tie breaker shall attend. He shall be entitled to be fully advised on the matter upon which he is to vote. If not prepared to vote at the time, he may require the clerk to enter an order adjourning the meeting to some future day, not to exceed thirty days, to be named in the minutes. He may have continuances, not to exceed thirty days, entered until he is ready to vote. When he votes, the clerk shall record his vote; the tie shall be broken; and the question shall be decided as he votes. If a meeting for any reason is not held on the day named in the minutes, the clerk shall enter on the minute book a day within ten days as a substitute day and notify all the members, and this shall continue until a meeting is held. After a tie has occurred, the tie breaker shall be considered a member of the board for the purpose of counting a quorum for the sole purpose of breaking the tie.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-70; 1972, c. 129; 1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 246; 1995, c. 56; 2006, c. 29; 2007, c. 100; 2014, c. 772.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 772, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not be construed to affect the term of any tie breaker appointed by an elected school board prior to July 1, 2014.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 29, in the last sentence of the first paragraph, deleted “§ ” preceding “15.2-410” and “or § ” preceding “22.1-47” and inserted “or 22.1-57.3” thereafter.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 100 deleted “in a county” following “school division” in the first sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 772 deleted “15.2-627” following “15.2-531” in the first paragraph, inserted “elected pursuant to §

15.2-627

or” and made a related change. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

§ 22.1-76.
Chairman; clerk; vice-chairman; deputy clerk; terms; compensation and bonds of clerk and deputy clerk; officers ineligible to serve as clerk and deputy clerk; approval of division superintendent’s designee.

Except as provided in § 22.1-57.3:3, at its annual meeting each school board shall elect one of its members as chairman, shall approve a designee of the division superintendent to attend meetings of the school board in the absence or inability to attend of the superintendent and on recommendation of the division superintendent shall appoint a clerk of the school board. The school board may also elect one of its members as vice-chairman and may appoint a deputy clerk who shall be empowered to act in all matters in case of the absence or inability to act of the chairman or clerk, respectively, or as otherwise provided by resolution of the school board. The term of the chairman, clerk and any vice-chairman and deputy clerk shall be one year.

The school board shall fix the compensation of the clerk and any deputy clerk.

The school board shall require the clerk and any deputy clerk each to furnish a corporate surety bond conditioned upon the faithful performance and discharge of his duties as such. The school board shall fix the amount of each bond which shall not be less than $10,000. The premium for each bond shall be paid by the school board.

No mayor, member of the governing body, other officer or deputy officer of a city, town or county, other than the division superintendent, shall be eligible for appointment as clerk or deputy clerk of a school board in such city, town or county.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-48, 22-48.1, 22-48.2, 22-71, 22-98; 1952, cc. 280, 593; 1954, c. 638; 1980, c. 559; 1995, c. 842.

§ 22.1-77.
Duties of clerk.

The clerk of the school board shall keep in a separate volume the minutes of the meetings of the school board, including all bids submitted on any building, material, supplies, work, or project to be let to contract by such school board, and in another volume a receipt and disbursement record as prescribed by the Board of Education and shall keep on file vouchers, contracts, and other official papers. They shall be subject to such periodic examinations as shall be prescribed or approved by the Board of Education. The clerk may keep such volumes, vouchers, contracts, and other official papers electronically. The clerk shall discharge, under the general direction of the division superintendent, such other duties in connection with the business of the school division as may be required of him by the school board or the Board of Education.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-53; 1980, c. 559; 2015, cc. 330, 388.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 330 and 388 are identical, and added the third sentence.

§ 22.1-78.
Bylaws and regulations.

A school board may adopt bylaws and regulations, not inconsistent with state statutes and regulations of the Board of Education, for its own government, for the management of its official business and for the supervision of schools, including but not limited to the proper discipline of students, including their conduct going to and returning from school.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-72, 22-96, 22-97; 1954, cc. 289, 291; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 60; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1966, c. 691; 1968, c. 501; 1970, c. 71; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1972, c. 511; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1980, c. 559.

Law Review.

For comment, “ ‘Working to the Contract’ in Virginia: Legal Consequences of Teachers’ Attempts to Limit Their Contractual Duties,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 449 (1982).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 22.

§ 22.1-79.
Powers and duties.

A school board shall:

See that the school laws are properly explained, enforced and observed;

Secure, by visitation or otherwise, as full information as possible about the conduct of the public schools in the school division and take care that they are conducted according to law and with the utmost efficiency;

Care for, manage and control the property of the school division and provide for the erecting, furnishing, equipping, and noninstructional operating of necessary school buildings and appurtenances and the maintenance thereof by purchase, lease, or other contracts;

Provide for the consolidation of schools or redistricting of school boundaries or adopt pupil assignment plans whenever such procedure will contribute to the efficiency of the school division;

Insofar as not inconsistent with state statutes and regulations of the Board of Education, operate and maintain the public schools in the school division and determine the length of the school term, the studies to be pursued, the methods of teaching and the government to be employed in the schools;

In instances in which no grievance procedure has been adopted prior to January 1, 1991, establish and administer by July 1, 1992, a grievance procedure for all school board employees, except the division superintendent and those employees covered under the provisions of Article 2 (§ 22.1-293 et seq.) and Article 3 (§ 22.1-306 et seq.) of Chapter 15 of this title, who have completed such probationary period as may be required by the school board, not to exceed 18 months. The grievance procedure shall afford a timely and fair method of the resolution of disputes arising between the school board and such employees regarding dismissal or other disciplinary actions, excluding suspensions, and shall be consistent with the provisions of the Board of Education’s procedures for adjusting grievances. Except in the case of dismissal, suspension, or other disciplinary action, the grievance procedure prescribed by the Board of Education pursuant to § 22.1-308 shall apply to all full-time employees of a school board, except supervisory employees;

Perform such other duties as shall be prescribed by the Board of Education or as are imposed by law;

Obtain public comment through a public hearing not less than 10 days after reasonable notice to the public in a newspaper of general circulation in the school division prior to providing (i) for the consolidation of schools; (ii) the transfer from the public school system of the administration of all instructional services for any public school classroom or all noninstructional services in the school division pursuant to a contract with any private entity or organization; or (iii) in school divisions having 15,000 pupils or more in average daily membership, for redistricting of school boundaries or adopting any pupil assignment plan affecting the assignment of 15 percent or more of the pupils in average daily membership in the affected school. Such public hearing may be held at the same time and place as the meeting of the school board at which the proposed action is taken if the public hearing is held before the action is taken. If a public hearing has been held prior to the effective date of this provision on a proposed consolidation, redistricting or pupil assignment plan which is to be implemented after the effective date of this provision, an additional public hearing shall not be required;

(Expires July 1, 2025) At least annually, survey the school division to identify critical shortages of (i) teachers and administrative personnel by subject matter and (ii) school bus drivers and report such critical shortages to the Superintendent of Public Instruction and to the Virginia Retirement System; however, the school board may request the division superintendent to conduct such survey and submit such report to the school board, the Superintendent, and the Virginia Retirement System; and

Ensure that the public schools within the school division are registered with the Department of State Police to receive from the State Police electronic notice of the registration, reregistration, or verification of registration information of any person required to register with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1 within that school division pursuant to §

9.1-914

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-72, 22-97; 1954, cc. 289, 291; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 60; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1966, c. 691; 1968, c. 501; 1970, c. 71; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1972, c. 511; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 8; 1987, c. 402; 1991, cc. 553, 668; 1994, c. 596; 1996, cc. 485, 790, 798; 1997, c. 382; 2004, c. 563; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2009, c. 459; 2013, cc. 588, 650; 2020, cc. 379, 437, 829.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 563, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2005, cc. 607 and 608, Acts 2009, c. 590, Acts 2015, c. 326, and Acts 2019, c. 765 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2025.”

Acts 2005, cc. 605 and 606, also amended Acts 2004, c. 563, cl. 3, providing for a July 1, 2007, expiration date. Subdivision 9 has been set out above with a July 1, 2025, expiration date at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 9, effective October 21, 2020, provides: “Each school board, as that term is defined in § 22.1-1 of the Code of Virginia, shall post in a publicly accessible and conspicuous location on its website the plan outlining its strategies for mitigating the spread and public health risk of the COVID-19 virus, consistent with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and Virginia Department of Health mitigation recommendations, that the school board is required to submit to the Department of Education before reopening schools in accordance with Phase II and III guidelines pursuant to the June 8, 2020, order of the State Health Commissioner.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 456, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. As used in this act:

“In-person instruction” means any form of instructional interaction between teachers and students that occurs in person and in real time.

“In-person instruction” does not include the act of proctoring remote online learning in a classroom.

“§ 2. Each school board shall offer in-person instruction to each student enrolled in the local school division in a public elementary and secondary school for at least the minimum number of required instructional hours and to each student enrolled in the local school division in a public school-based early childhood care and education program for the entirety of the instructional time provided pursuant to such program. For the purposes of this act, each school board shall (i) adopt, implement, and, when appropriate, update specific parameters for the provision of in-person instruction and (ii) provide such in-person instruction in a manner in which it adheres, to the maximum extent practicable, to any currently applicable mitigation strategies for early childhood care and education programs and elementary and secondary schools to reduce the transmission of COVID-19 that have been provided by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

“§ 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 2 of this act:

“1. If a local school board determines, in collaboration with the local health department and in strict adherence to ‘Step 2: Determine the Level of School Impact‘ in the Department of Health’s Interim Guidance to K-12 School Reopening or any similar provision in any successor guidance document published by the Department of Health, that the transmission of COVID-19 within a school building is at a high level, the local school board may provide fully remote virtual instruction or a combination of in-person instruction and remote virtual instruction to the at-risk groups of students indicated as the result of such collaboration or, if needed, the whole student population in the school building, but in each instance only for as long as it is necessary to address and ameliorate the level of transmission of COVID-19 in the school building.

“2. Any local school board may, for any period during which the Governor’s declaration of a state of emergency due to the COVID-19 pandemic is in effect, provide fully remote virtual instruction to any enrolled student upon the request of such student’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian.

“3. Any local school board may permit any teacher who is required to isolate as the result of a COVID-19 infection and any teacher who is required to quarantine as the result of exposure to another individual with a COVID-19 infection to teach from a remote location and in a fully virtual manner for the duration of such period of isolation or quarantine, consistent with the mitigation strategies as set forth in § 2 of this act.

“4. Any teacher or other school staff member who is permitted to perform any job function from a remote location or in a fully virtual manner as a reasonable accommodation pursuant to Title I of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. § 12111 et seq.) shall be permitted to continue to perform any such job function in such a manner.

“§ 4. The Department of Education shall establish benchmarks for successful virtual learning and guidelines for providing interventions to students who fail to meet such benchmarks and for transitioning such students back to in-person instruction.

“§ 5. All teachers and school staff shall be offered access to receive an approved COVID-19 vaccination through their relevant local health district.”

“In-person instruction” does not include the act of proctoring remote online learning in a classroom.

“§ 2. Each school board shall offer in-person instruction to each student enrolled in the local school division in a public elementary and secondary school for at least the minimum number of required instructional hours and to each student enrolled in the local school division in a public school-based early childhood care and education program for the entirety of the instructional time provided pursuant to such program. For the purposes of this act, each school board shall (i) adopt, implement, and, when appropriate, update specific parameters for the provision of in-person instruction and (ii) provide such in-person instruction in a manner in which it adheres, to the maximum extent practicable, to any currently applicable mitigation strategies for early childhood care and education programs and elementary and secondary schools to reduce the transmission of COVID-19 that have been provided by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

“§ 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 2 of this act:

“1. If a local school board determines, in collaboration with the local health department and in strict adherence to ‘Step 2: Determine the Level of School Impact‘ in the Department of Health’s Interim Guidance to K-12 School Reopening or any similar provision in any successor guidance document published by the Department of Health, that the transmission of COVID-19 within a school building is at a high level, the local school board may provide fully remote virtual instruction or a combination of in-person instruction and remote virtual instruction to the at-risk groups of students indicated as the result of such collaboration or, if needed, the whole student population in the school building, but in each instance only for as long as it is necessary to address and ameliorate the level of transmission of COVID-19 in the school building.

“2. Any local school board may, for any period during which the Governor’s declaration of a state of emergency due to the COVID-19 pandemic is in effect, provide fully remote virtual instruction to any enrolled student upon the request of such student’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian.

“3. Any local school board may permit any teacher who is required to isolate as the result of a COVID-19 infection and any teacher who is required to quarantine as the result of exposure to another individual with a COVID-19 infection to teach from a remote location and in a fully virtual manner for the duration of such period of isolation or quarantine, consistent with the mitigation strategies as set forth in § 2 of this act.

“4. Any teacher or other school staff member who is permitted to perform any job function from a remote location or in a fully virtual manner as a reasonable accommodation pursuant to Title I of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. § 12111 et seq.) shall be permitted to continue to perform any such job function in such a manner.

“§ 4. The Department of Education shall establish benchmarks for successful virtual learning and guidelines for providing interventions to students who fail to meet such benchmarks and for transitioning such students back to in-person instruction.

“§ 5. All teachers and school staff shall be offered access to receive an approved COVID-19 vaccination through their relevant local health district.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 456, cl. 2 provides: “That in order to facilitate the implementation of § 3 of the first enactment of this act, the Department of Health shall maintain a guidance document for K-12 school reopening that contains metrics for determining whether transmission of COVID-19 within public school buildings is at a low, medium, or high level.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 456, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on August 1, 2022.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 563, effective April 12, 2004, substituted “18” for “eighteen” in subdivision 6; in subdivision 8, substituted “10” for “ten” and “15” for “fifteen”; added subdivision 9 and made related changes. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and added subdivision 10 and made related changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 459, in subdivision 6, in the second sentence, deleted “suspension” following “dismissal” and inserted “excluding suspensions,” added the last sentence and made a related change.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and deleted “except that there shall be no right to a hearing before a fact-finding panel” at the end of the second sentence in subdivision 6.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 379 and 437 are identical, and in subdivision 9, inserted “and (ii) school bus drivers” and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 deleted “or” preceding “reregistration,” inserted “or verification of registration information” following “reregistration,” and substituted “person required to register with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1” for “sex offender” in subdivision 10.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 13.

§ 22.1-79.1.
Opening of the school year; approvals for certain alternative schedules.

Each local school board shall set the school calendar so that the first day students are required to attend school shall be no earlier than 14 days before Labor Day. In each school division in which the school board sets the school calendar so that the first day students are required to attend school is before Labor Day, such school board shall close each school in the school division from the Friday immediately preceding Labor Day through Labor Day. The Board of Education may waive this requirement based on a school board certifying that it meets the good cause requirements of subsection B.

For purposes of this section, “good cause” means a school division is providing its students, in the school year for which the waiver is sought, with instructional programs that are offered on a year-round basis by the school division in one or more of its elementary or middle or high schools. Any waiver provided pursuant to this subsection shall only apply to the opening date for those schools where such year-round instructional programs are offered.

Individual schools may propose, and local school boards may approve, pursuant to guidelines developed by the Board of Education, alternative school schedule plans providing for the operation of schools on a four-day weekly calendar, so long as a minimum of 990 hours of instructional time is provided for grades kindergarten through 12.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other provision of law, the school board of any school division located in Planning District 16 that was not granted a good cause waiver pursuant to this section for the 2018-2019 school year but would qualify for such a waiver pursuant to this section as it was in effect prior to July 1, 2019, for the 2019-2020 school year may set the school calendar so that the first day students are required to attend is earlier than Labor Day, including earlier than 14 days before Labor Day. Additionally, the school board of any school division located in Planning District 16 that is entirely surrounded by two school divisions that either were granted a waiver pursuant to Chapter 3 of the Acts of Assembly of 2012, Special Session I, or would qualify for a good cause waiver pursuant to this section as it was in effect prior to July 1, 2019, for the 2019-2020 school year may open schools on the same opening date as either such surrounding school division.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other provision of law, the school board of any school division from which students attend Northern Neck Technical Center may set the school calendar so that the first day that students are required to attend school is earlier than Labor Day, including earlier than 14 days before Labor Day.

History.

1986, c. 587; 1998, c. 702; 2003, c. 724; 2010, cc. 49, 88; 2011, cc. 216, 387; 2015, cc. 701, 702; 2019, cc. 569, 570, 637; 2020, cc. 582, 695.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1988, c. 114 repeals cl. 2 of Acts 1986, c. 587, which had provided that this section was to expire on July 1, 1988.

Acts
2019, c. 637, cl. 1 was codified as subsection D of
§ 22.1-79.1.

Acts
2019, cc. 569 and
570, cl. 2 provides: “That any school board of a school division that was granted a waiver for the 2018-2019 school year under one of the good cause requirements then in effect pursuant to
§ 22.1-79.1 of the Code of Virginia or pursuant to Chapter 3 of the Acts of Assembly of 2012, Special Session I, may continue to set the school calendar so that the first day students are required to attend is earlier than 14 days before Labor Day. Additionally, any school board of a school division that was granted a waiver pursuant to Chapter 3 of the Acts of Assembly of 2012, Special Session I, shall not be required to close the Friday immediately preceding Labor Day.”

Acts
2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552,
Item 145 A 17, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “To provide additional flexibility, notwithstanding the provisions of
§ 22.1-79.1, Code of Virginia, any school division that was granted a waiver regarding the opening date of the school year for the 2011-2012 school year under the good cause requirements shall continue to be granted a waiver for the 2020-2021 school year and the 2021-2022 school year.”

Acts
2020, c. 582, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2022.”

Acts
2020, c. 582, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Education shall adopt regulations establishing standards for accreditation that include a requirement that the standard school day for students in kindergarten average at least 5.5 instructional hours in order to qualify for full accreditation. The Board of Education shall adopt such regulations by July 1, 2022.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 724 substituted “10 years” for “ten years” in subdivision B 1, substituted “programs that are offered” for “programs which are offered” in the last sentence of subdivision B 3, and added subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 49 and 88 are identical, and substituted “requirement based on a school board certifying that it meets one of the good cause requirements of subsection B” for “requirement on a showing of good cause” at the end of subsection A.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 216 substituted “Virtual Virginia” for “the electronic classroom” in subdivision B 2.

The 2011 amendment by c. 387 added subdivision B 4 and made related changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 701 and 702 are identical, and deleted the former last sentence in subsection C, which read “No alternative plan that reduces the instructional time in the core academics of English, mathematics, social studies, and science shall be approved.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 569 and 570 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 582, effective July 1, 2022, substituted “grades kindergarten through 12” for “grades one through 12 and 540 hours for kindergarten” at the end of subsection C.

The 2020 amendment by c. 695 added subsection E.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

School start date. —

Attorney General unable to conclude that § 22.1-79.1, which directs school boards to set the starting date for students after Labor Day, is unconstitutional. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert Tata, Member, House of Delegates, 10-034, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 31 (5/24/10).

§ 22.1-79.2.
Uniforms in public schools; Board of Education guidelines.

The Board of Education shall develop model guidelines for local school boards to utilize when establishing requirements for pupils to wear uniforms. In developing these guidelines, the Board shall consider (i) ways to promote parental and community involvement, (ii) relevant state and federal constitutional concerns, such as freedom of religion and freedom of speech, and (iii) the ability of pupils to purchase such clothing.

Upon approval by the Board of the model guidelines, local school boards may establish requirements, consistent with the Board’s guidelines, for the students enrolled in any of their schools to wear uniforms while in attendance at such school during the regular school day. No state funds may be used for the purchase of school uniforms.

History.

1995, cc. 508, 521, 526.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 508 added this section as § 22.1-276.2, and Acts 1995, cc. 521 and 526 enacted this section as § 22.1-79.2. The Virginia Code Commission assigned the section number for this section according to Acts 1995, cc. 521 and 526.